Illinois, session 104th, HB2318.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 5Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 5/1-1)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Title.) This Act may be cited as the the Probate 8Act of 1975. 9(Source: P.A. 79-328.)